Maryland, session 2026, SB0555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–3201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Council” means the Virginia I. Jones Alzheimer’s Disease and Related
Dementias Council.
(c) “Director” means the Director of Dementia Services and Brain Health
established under Subtitle 32A of this title.
13–3202.
There is a Virginia I. Jones Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementias Council.
13–3205.
(a) The [Director] DEMENTIA SERVICES AND BRAIN HEALTH PROGRAM,
with assistance from the Department of Aging, shall provide staff support for the Council.
(b) The Director may request staffing assistance from public health entities with
an interest in the duties of the Council.
13–3206.

SENATE BILL 555 3
The Council shall:
(1) Update the State Plan on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementias
and advocate for the State Plan;
(2) (i) Examine the needs of individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and
related dementias and their caregivers; and
(ii) Identify methods through which the State can most effectively
and efficiently assist in meeting those needs;
(3) (I) EXAMINE THE READINESS AND CAPACITY OF HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS TO DELIVER CARE TO INDIVIDUALS WITH OR AT RISK FOR ALZHEIMER’S
DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS; AND
(II) IDENTIFY METHODS THROUGH WHICH THE STATE CAN
ASSIST HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS IN DELIVERING CARE TO INDIVIDUALS WITH OR
AT RISK FOR ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS IN THE MOST
EFFECTIVE AND EFFICIENT MANNER;
[(3)] (4) Advise the Governor and the General Assembly on policy,
funding, regulatory, and other issues related to individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and
related dementias and their caregivers; and
[(4)] (5) Develop and promote strategies to encourage brain health and
reduce cognitive decline.
13–3207.
On or before September 1, 2022, and on or before September 1 every 5 years
thereafter, the Council shall issue and publish an update to the State Plan on Alzheimer’s
Disease and Related Dementias.
13–32A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Council” means the Virginia I. Jones Alzheimer’s Disease and Related
Dementias Council.
(c) “Director” means the Director of Dementia Services and Brain Health.
(D) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DEMENTIA SERVICES AND BRAIN HEALTH
PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 555
13–32A–02.
[(a)] There is a Director of Dementia Services and Brain Health in the Department.
[(b) The Director shall report to the Secretary.]
13–32A–03.
The position of Director shall be a full–time and permanent position.
13–32A–04.
[(a) The purpose of the position of Director is to coordinate and facilitate
communication relating to dementia services in the State.]
(A) THERE IS A DEMENTIA SERVICES AND BRAIN HEALTH PROGRAM IN
THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO LEAD THE STATE’S PUBLIC
HEALTH EFFORTS RELATING TO BRAIN HEALTH AND DEMENTIA.
[(b)] (D) The [Director] PROGRAM shall:
(1) Coordinate the Department’s approach to addressing Alzheimer’s
disease and other forms of dementia and brain health, including through public awareness,
prevention, and early detection and diagnosis;
(2) Staff the Council and [oversee implementation of the State Plan on
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementias] UPDATE THE COUNCIL EACH QUARTER ON
THE PROGRAM’S ACTIVITIES;
(3) OVERSEE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE STATE PLAN ON
ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS;
[(3)] (4) Assess, analyze, and conduct outreach to share cognitive health
and dementia–related data;
[(4)] (5) Develop and monitor implementation milestones and
measurable outcomes to assess progress in achieving the goals laid out in the State Plan
on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementias;

SENATE BILL 555 5
[(5)] (6) Identify efficiencies across State agencies that aid individuals
with dementia and their caregivers, and coordinate public and private stakeholder
partnerships;
(7) SUPPORT AND PROMOTE THE DELIVERY OF DEMENTIA–CAPABLE
CARE ACROSS HEALTH CARE SETTINGS THROUGH VARIOUS METHODS, INCLUDING:
(I) ESTABLISHING AND MAINTAINING A CLINICAL PROVIDER
RESOURCE TOOLKIT FOR DEMENTIA CARE, AS DEFINED IN § 13–32A–07 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, TO SUPPORT HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS IN DELIVERING
EVIDENCE–BASED, PERSON–CENTERED CARE;
(II) COORDINATING WITH ACADEMIC INSTITUTIONS, HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS BOARDS, AND CONTINUING EDUCATION PROVIDERS TO PROMOTE
PARTICIPATION IN DEMENTIA–SPECIFIC EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND
CERTIFICATION FOR HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONALS; AND
(III) COLLABORATING WITH STATE–LED CARE
TRANSFORMATION INITIATIVES TO IDENTIFY OPPORTUNITIES TO INCORPORATE
DEMENTIA–CAPABLE CARE PRACTICES INTO HEALTH CARE MODELS;
[(6)] (8) Apply for grants to enable the implementation of the State Plan
on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementias goals to reduce the risk of dementia, and to
improve the quality of care for individuals with dementia and their caregivers; and
[(7)] (9) Carry out other duties relevant to the support of individuals with
dementia as may be assigned by the Department.
13–32A–05.
On or before September 1, 2023, and on or before September 1 every 5 years
thereafter, the Director shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee on the activities and recommendations of the
[Director] PROGRAM.
13–32A–06.
The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation to fund the
position of Director and the Council, as follows:
(1) For fiscal year 2023, at least $71,400;
(2) For fiscal year 2024, at least $83,000;

SENATE BILL 555
(3) For fiscal year 2025, at least $85,300;
(4) For fiscal year 2026, at least $87,600; and
(5) For fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, at least $89,900.
13–32A–07.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TOOLKIT” MEANS THE CLINICAL PROVIDER
RESOURCE TOOLKIT FOR DEMENTIA CARE FOR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
PARTNERSHIP WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING, THE COUNCIL, AND OTHER
PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ORGANIZATIONS WITH EXPERTISE IN ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE OR
RELATED DEMENTIAS SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A CLINICAL PROVIDER
RESOURCE TOOLKIT FOR DEMENTIA CARE FOR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE TOOLKIT IS TO PROVIDE A CENTRALIZED,
UP–TO–DATE RESOURCE TO SUPPORT HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS IN CARING FOR
PATIENTS WHO ARE AT RISK FOR OR WHO MAY HAVE DEMENTIA.
(D) THE TOOLKIT DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON:
(1) BE COMPOSED OF MATERIALS THAT CAN BE DEVELOPED USING
EXISTING RESOURCES AND EXPERTISE WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OR OBTAINED
THROUGH PARTNERSHIPS WITH ANY OTHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ORGANIZATION OR
ENTITY ENTITIES AS DETERMINED NECESSARY BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) INCLUDE INFORMATION ON:
(1) (I) RISK FACTORS FOR ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED
DEMENTIAS, INCLUDING CHRONIC DISEASES AND THE CO–OCCURRENCE OF DOWN
SYNDROME (TRISOMY–21);
(2) (II) RISK REDUCTION STRATEGIES, INCLUDING INFORMATION
ON LIFESTYLE INTERVENTIONS TO REDUCE DEMENTIA RISK;
(3) (III) THE IMPORTANCE OF EARLY DETECTION AND DIAGNOSIS
OF ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS;
(4) (IV) VALIDATED ASSESSMENT TOOLS FOR THE DETECTION AND
DIAGNOSIS OF COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT;

SENATE BILL 555 7
(5) (V) THE RACIAL AND ETHNIC DISPARITIES IN DETECTING,
DIAGNOSING, AND ACCESSING TREATMENT AND SERVICES;
(6) (VI) PERSON–CENTERED CARE DELIVERY AND RELEVANT
SOURCES OF CLINICAL PRACTICE GUIDELINES AND TOOLS;
(7) (VII) EFFECTIVE CARE PLANNING TOOLS, INCLUDING:
(I) 1. AVAILABLE REIMBURSEMENT TOOLS, INCLUDING
RELEVANT BILLING CODES, FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT;
(II) 2. REFERRAL PATHWAYS TO COMMUNITY–BASED
SERVICES AND CARE PLANNING RESOURCES; AND
(III) 3. INFORMATION ON TREATMENT OPTIONS AND
RELEVANT SOURCES FOR GUIDELINES; AND
(8) (VIII) CONTINUING EDUCATION OPPORTUNITIES RELATED TO
DEMENTIA CARE BEST PRACTICES.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROMOTE THE USE OF THE TOOLKIT ACROSS
HEALTH CARE SECTORS, INCLUDING:
(1) MANAGED CARE PROGRAMS;
(2) ACADEMIC RESEARCH INSTITUTIONS;
(3) HOSPITALS AND HEALTH SYSTEMS;
(4) FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTERS;
(5) HOSPITAL AND HEALTH SYSTEM ASSOCIATIONS;
(6) PHYSICIAN AND MEDICAL STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS;
(7) ORGANIZATIONS REPRESENTING THE ADVANCEMENT OF NURSES,
HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONALS, AND HEALTH CARE ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(8) ANY OTHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ORGANIZATION, ENTITY, OR
PART OF AN ORGANIZATION OR ENTITY THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS NECESSARY.

SENATE BILL 555
(F) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW AND UPDATE THE INFORMATION IN THE TOOLKIT TO
REFLECT THE MOST RECENT AND ACCURATE AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.